Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4970.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1280h. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, and by not later than the beginning of each subsequent school year, the department shall assign a letter grade of A, B, C, D, or F for each of the following indicators for each public school in this state: (a) Pupil proficiency in mathematics and English language arts, as measured by the percentage of all pupils who achieve proficiency on the applicable state assessment, as determined by the department. (b) Pupils who achieve adequate growth in mathematics and English language arts on the applicable state assessment. The measure of adequate growth under this subdivision may incorporate pupil growth measures, as reported by the model value-added growth and projection analytics system implemented by the department, and must be based on any of the following, as determined by the department: (i) Pupil growth measured from fall to spring of the same school year or from the spring of one school year to the spring of the next school year, as appropriate based on the timing of the applicable state assessments. (ii) Pupils who scored proficient on the immediately preceding applicable state assessment and who at least maintained a score of proficient on the most recent applicable state assessment. (iii) Pupils who scored less than proficient on the immediately preceding applicable state assessment and who demonstrate growth sufficient to reach proficiency in 3 school years. (c) Pupils who are English language learners and who achieve adequate growth toward proficiency in the English language, as determined by the department and as required under the every student succeeds act, Public Law 114-95. (d) The graduation rate of pupils enrolled in high school, as applicable and as defined by and reported to CEPI. (e) The academic performance of the public school's pupils on the applicable state assessment compared to pupil performance on the applicable state assessment for all public schools serving a similar pupil population. The department shall determine similar pupil population using demographic factors that the department considers to have a strong correlation to academic achievement.